Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2145
Cease and desist orders; other orders.

Whenever it appears to the director that any insurer or any director, officer, employee, or agent thereof has engaged in any transaction or entered into a contract which is subject to sections 44-2133 to 44-2136 and which would not have been approved had such approval been requested, the director may order the insurer to cease and desist immediately any further activity under that transaction or contract. After notice and hearing, the director may also order the insurer to void any such contracts and restore the status quo if such action is in the best interest of the policyholders, the creditors, or the public.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 25.